California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) Licensees shall not base, either partially or completely, their analysis or opinion of market value on the basis of race, color, religion (creed), gender, gender expression, age, national origin (ancestry), disability, marital status, source of income, sexual orientation, familial status, employment status, or military status of either the present or prospective owners or occupants of the subject property, or of the present owners or occupants of the properties in the vicinity of the subject property, or on any other basis prohibited by the federal Fair Housing Act.

(b) The
 provisions of Section 10185 do not apply to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 352, Sec. 5.   (AB 948)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11425.

(a) The bureau shall conduct a one-time study on the feasibility of mandatory licensing for real estate appraisers in California. The bureau shall report its findings, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to all appropriate committees of the Legislature on or before December 31, 2028. The report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The types of real estate appraisal assignments for which a license is currently not required in California, including the estimated population of individuals engaged in each type of appraisal assignment.

(2) Information from other states,
 including the scope of authorized activities in each state, license application and issuance costs, licensee populations, and any issues or consumer protection resulting from regulation in that state.

(3) The appraisal assignments that are recommended to be regulated in California, recommended exemptions, an implementation plan, recommended amendments to existing law, and an estimated timeline for implementation.

(4) Fiscal estimates, including estimated costs of implementing the recommendations, estimated revenue generated by the recommendations, and the potential impact to existing license fees.

(b) The bureau shall hold at least two public meetings prior to publication of the report to gather information from the
 public, consult with interested parties, and incorporate relevant stakeholder feedback.

(c) This section is repealed on January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 66.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. CERTIFIED COMMON INTEREST DEVELOPMENT MANAGER [11500. - 11506.]



  CHAPTER 1. Purpose and Definitions [11500. - 11501.]

11500.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Common interest development” means a residential development identified in Section 4100 of the Civil Code.

(b) “Association” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4080 of the Civil Code.

(c) “Financial services” means acts performed or offered to be performed, for compensation, for an association, including, but not limited to, the preparation of internal unaudited financial statements, internal accounting and bookkeeping functions, billing of assessments, and related services.

(d) “Management services” means acts performed or offered to be performed in an advisory capacity for an association including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Administering or supervising the collection, reporting, and archiving of the financial or common area assets of an association or common interest development, at the direction of the association’s board of directors.

(2) Implementing resolutions and directives of the board of directors of the association elected to oversee the operation of a common interest development.

(3) Implementing provisions of governing documents, as defined in Section 4150 of the Civil Code, that govern the operation of the common interest development.

(4) Administering association contracts, including
 insurance contracts, within the scope of the association’s duties or with other common interest development managers, vendors, contractors, and other third-party providers of goods and services to an association or common interest development.

(e) “Professional association for common interest development managers” means an organization that meets all of the following:

(1) Has at least 200 members or certificants who are common interest development managers in California.

(2) Has been in existence for at least five years.

(3) Operates pursuant to Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) Certifies that a common interest development manager has met the criteria set forth in Section
 11502 without requiring membership in the association.

(5) Requires adherence to a code of professional ethics and standards of practice for certified common interest development managers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 13.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

11501.

(a) “Common interest development manager” means an individual who for compensation, or in expectation of compensation, provides or contracts to provide management or financial services, or represents himself or herself to act in the capacity of providing management or financial services to an association. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual may not be required to obtain a real estate or broker’s license in order to perform the services of a common interest development manager to an association.

(b) “Common interest development manager” also means any of the following:

(1) An individual who is a partner in a partnership, a shareholder or officer in a corporation, or who, in any other business entity acts in a capacity to advise, supervise, and direct the activity of a registrant or provisional registrant, or who acts as a principal on behalf of a company that provides the services of a common interest development manager.

(2) An individual operating under a fictitious business name who provides the services of a common interest development manager.

This section may not be construed to require an association to hire for compensation a common interest development manager, unless required to do so by its governing documents. Nothing in this part shall be construed to supersede any law that requires a license, permit, or any other form of registration, to provide management or financial services. Nothing in this section shall preclude a licensee of the California Board of Accountancy from providing financial services to an association within the scope of his or her license in addition to the preparation of reviewed and audited financial statements and the preparation of the association’s tax returns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 236, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Certified Common Interest Development Manager [11502. - 11503.]

11502.

In order to be called a “certified common interest development manager,” a person shall meet one of the following requirements:

(a) Prior to July 1, 2003, has passed a knowledge, skills, and aptitude examination as specified in Section 11502.5 or has been granted a certification or a designation by a professional association for common interest development managers, and who has, within five years prior to July 1, 2004, received instruction in California law pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(b) On or after July 1, 2003, has successfully completed an educational curriculum that shall be no less than a combined 30 hours in coursework described in this subdivision and passed
 an examination or examinations that test competence in common interest development management in the following areas:

(1) The law that relates to the management of common interest developments, including, but not limited to, the following courses of study:

(A) Topics covered by the Davis-Stirling Common Interest Development Act, contained in Part 5 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 4 of the Civil Code, including, but not limited to, the types of California common interest developments, disclosure requirements pertaining to common interest developments, meeting requirements, financial reporting requirements, and member access to association records.

(B) Personnel issues, including, but not limited to, general matters related to independent contractor or employee status, the laws on harassment, the Unruh Civil
 Rights Act, the California Fair Employment and Housing Act, and the Americans with Disabilities Act.

(C) Risk management, including, but not limited to, insurance coverage, maintenance, operations, and emergency preparedness.

(D) Property protection for associations, including, but not limited to, pertinent matters relating to environmental hazards such as asbestos, radon gas, and lead-based paint, the Vehicle Code, local and municipal regulations, family day care facilities, energy conservation, Federal Communications Commission rules and regulations, and solar energy systems.

(E) Business affairs of associations, including, but not limited to, necessary compliance with federal, state, and local law.

(F) Basic understanding of governing documents,
 codes, and regulations relating to the activities and affairs of associations and common interest developments.

(2) Instruction in general management that is related to the managerial and business skills needed for management of a common interest development, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Finance issues, including, but not limited to, budget preparation; management; administration or supervision of the collection, reporting, and archiving of the financial or common area assets of an association or common interest development; bankruptcy laws; and assessment collection.

(B) Contract negotiation and administration.

(C) Supervision of employees and staff.

(D) Management of
 maintenance programs.

(E) Management and administration of rules, regulations, and parliamentary procedures.

(F) Management and administration of architectural standards.

(G) Management and administration of the association’s recreational programs and facilities.

(H) Management and administration of owner and resident communications.

(I) Training and strategic planning for the association’s board of directors and its committees.

(J) Implementation of association policies and procedures.

(K) Ethics, professional conduct, and standards of practice for common
 interest development managers.

(L) Current issues relating to common interest developments.

(M) Conflict avoidance and resolution mechanisms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 14.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

11502.5.

The course related competency examination or examinations and education provided to a certified common interest development manager pursuant to Section 11502 by any professional association for common interest development managers, or any postsecondary educational institution, shall be developed and administered in a manner consistent with standards and requirements set forth by the American Educational Research Association’s “Standards for Educational and Psychological Testing,” and the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission’s “Uniform Guidelines for Employee Selection Procedures,” the Unruh Civil Rights Act, the California Fair Employment and Housing Act, and the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, or the course or courses that have been approved as a continuing education course or an equivalent course of study pursuant to the regulations of the Real Estate Commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 236, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.

A “certified common interest development manager” does not include a common interest development management firm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1116, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Disclosure Requirements [11504. - 11504.]

11504.

On or before September 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, a person who either provides or contemplates providing the services of a common interest development manager to an association shall disclose to the board of directors of the association the following information:

(a) Whether or not the common interest development manager has met the requirements of Section 11502 so he or she may be called a certified common interest development manager.

(b) The name, address, and telephone number of the professional association that certified the common interest development manager, the date the manager was certified, and the status of the certification.

(c) The location of his or her primary office.

(d) Prior to entering into or renewing a contract with an association, the common interest development manager shall disclose to the board of directors of the association or common interest development whether the fidelity insurance of the common interest development manager or his or her employer covers the current year’s operating and reserve funds of the association. This requirement shall not be construed to compel an association to require a common interest development manager to obtain or maintain fidelity insurance.

(e) Whether the common interest development manager possesses an active real estate license.

(f) A common interest development manager or common interest development management firm shall disclose information required in Section 5375 of the Civil Code.

(g) Whether or not the common interest development manager receives a referral fee or other monetary benefit from a third-party provider distributing documents pursuant to Section 5300 of the Civil Code.

(h) An affirmative written acknowledgment that the disclosure provided to a member or potential member pursuant to Sections 4528 and 5300 of the Civil Code, and all documents provided thereunder, are the property of the
 association and not its managing agent or the agent’s managing firm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 127, Sec. 1.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Unfair Business Practices [11505. - 11505.]

11505.

It is an unfair business practice for a common interest development manager, a company that employs the common interest development manager, or a company that is controlled by a company that also has a financial interest in a company employing that manager, to do any of the following:

(a) On or after July 1, 2003, to hold oneself out or use the title of “certified common interest development manager” or any other term that implies or suggests that the person is certified as a common interest development manager without meeting the requirements of Section 11502.

(b) To state or advertise that he or she is certified, registered, or licensed by a governmental agency to perform the
 functions of a certified common interest development manager.

(c) To state or advertise a registration or license number, unless the license or registration is specified by a statute, regulation, or ordinance.

(d) To fail to comply with any item to be disclosed in Section 11504 of this code, or Section 5375 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 16.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 86 of Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Sunset Review [11506. - 11506.]

11506.

This part shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 30.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. WEIGHTS AND MEASURES [12001. - 13800.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [12001. - 12027.]

12001.

The definitions in this chapter apply to this division only and do not affect the provisions of any other division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12002.

“Department” means the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 246, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12003.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 44.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12004.

“State Sealer” means the chief of the division of the department charged with the enforcement of the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12005.

Whenever any provision of this division makes reference to the National Bureau of Standards, that reference shall be construed to include the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1047, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12006.

“County Sealer” means any sealer appointed by a county. A county may in its discretion refer to its sealer as the county director of weights and measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 254.)
-------------------------------------------

12008.

“Sealer,” when used without qualification, includes the State Sealer, county sealers and their deputies and inspectors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

12009.

“Sell,” in any of its variant forms, includes barter, exchange, trade, rent, lease, keep for sale, offer for sale, or expose for sale, in any of their variant forms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12009.5.

“Distribute,” in any of its variant forms, includes keep for distribution, offer for distribution, or expose for distribution, in any of their variant forms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 527.)
-------------------------------------------

12010.

“Use,” in any of its variant forms includes keep for use in any of its variant forms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12011.

“Person” includes person, firm, corporation or association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12011.5.

Wherever in this division the terms “copies” or “standards” or “copies of the standard weights and measures” are used, such terms shall refer to the original standards in the possession of the department or to true and accurate copies derived therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

12011.6.

“Container” means any receptacle or carton, whether lidded or unlidded, into which a commodity is packed or placed, or any wrappings with or into which any commodity is wrapped or put for sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1384.)
-------------------------------------------

12011.7.

“Pallet” means any portable platform upon which containers or material is placed to facilitate handling.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 344.)
-------------------------------------------

12012.

The secretary may exercise any power conferred upon the department or upon the State Sealer by this division through the State Sealer or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 18.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12012.1.

The secretary may bring an action to enjoin the violation, or the threatened violation, of any provision of this division, or of any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, in the superior court in the county in which the violation occurs or is about to occur. There may be joined in one proceeding any number of defendants alleged to be violating the same provisions or regulations, although their properties, interests, residence,
 or place of business, may be in several counties and the violations separate and distinct. Any proceeding that is brought pursuant to this section shall be governed in all other respects by the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The county sealer of any county acting through the district attorney or county counsel of that county may bring an action to enjoin the violation in the county or the threatened violation in the county of any provision of this division or of any regulation adopted pursuant thereto in the same manner as may the secretary, and if the secretary joins as a party plaintiff, those actions shall not be limited to violations occurring within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 19.   (SB 1576)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12013.

(a) Any sealer shall have the authority, as a public officer, to arrest, without a warrant, any person whenever such officer has reasonable cause to believe that the person to be arrested has, in his presence, violated any provision of this division, the violation of which is declared to be a public offense. 

In any case in which an arrest is made pursuant to this authority for an offense declared to be a misdemeanor or an infraction, the arresting officer may, instead of taking the person arrested before a magistrate, follow the procedure prescribed by Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of
 Part 2 of the Penal Code, unless the arrested person demands to be taken before a magistrate. The provisions of such chapter shall thereafter apply with respect to any proceeding based upon the issuance of a citation pursuant to this authority.

This subdivision shall not be interpreted to prevent further restriction by the board of supervisors of a county of the authority of a county sealer or his deputies to make arrests.

(b) There shall be no civil liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, any person, acting pursuant to subdivision (a) and within the scope of his authority, for false arrest or false imprisonment arising out of any arrest which is lawful or which the arresting officer, at the time of such arrest, had reasonable cause to believe was lawful. No such officer shall be deemed an aggressor or lose his right to self-defense by the use of reasonable force to effect
 the arrest or to prevent escape or to overcome resistance.

(c) Any sealer may serve all processes and notices throughout the state; provided, that county sealers and their deputies are authorized to serve processes and notices only within the boundaries of the county which employs them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 527.)
-------------------------------------------

12014.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any sealer who seals any weight, measure, balance or weighing or measuring instrument or apparatus before first testing and making it conform with the standards of the state, or who condemns any weight, measure, balance or weighing or measuring instrument or apparatus without first testing it is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) A sealer may engage in a planned program of probability sampling of devices, using methods approved by the secretary. The sealing of a device by a sealer pursuant to such sampling and testing program is exempt from the provisions of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 45.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12015.

Any sealer having knowledge of a violation of any of the provisions of any law relating to weights and measures shall cause the violator to be prosecuted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12015.3.

(a) The sealer may levy a civil penalty against a person violating any provision of this division or a regulation adopted pursuant to any of these provisions, of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation. It is a complete defense to a criminal prosecution for a violation of any provision of this division or a regulation adopted pursuant to any provision of this division that the defendant has been assessed and has paid a civil penalty under this section for the same act or acts constituting the violation. Any civil
 penalty under this section shall be cumulative to civil remedies or penalties imposed under any other law.

(b) Before a civil penalty is levied, the person charged with the violation shall be given a written notice of the proposed action including the nature of the violation and the amount of the proposed penalty, and shall have the right to request a hearing. The request shall be made within 20 days after receiving notice of the proposed action. A notice of the proposed action that is sent by certified mail to the last known address of the person charged shall be considered received even if delivery is refused or the notice is not accepted at that address. If a hearing is requested, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least 10 days before the date set for the hearing. At the hearing, the person shall be given an opportunity to review the sealer’s evidence and to present evidence on his or her own behalf. If a hearing
 is not timely requested, the sealer may take the action proposed without a hearing.

(c) If the person upon whom the sealer levied a civil penalty requested and appeared at a hearing, the person may appeal the sealer’s decision to the secretary within 30 days of the date of receiving a copy of the sealer’s decision. The following procedures apply to the appeal:

(1) The appeal shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or his or her authorized agent, state the grounds for the appeal, and include a copy of the sealer’s decision. The appellant shall file a copy of the appeal with the sealer at the same time it is filed with the secretary.

(2) The appellant and the sealer may, at the time of filing the appeal or within 10 days thereafter or at a later time prescribed by the secretary, present the record of the
 hearing including written evidence that was submitted at the hearing and a written argument to the secretary stating grounds for affirming, modifying, or reversing the sealer’s decision.

(3) The secretary may grant oral arguments upon application made at the time written arguments are filed.

(4) If an application to present an oral argument is granted, written notice of the time and place for the oral argument shall be given at least 10 days before the date set therefor. The times may be altered by mutual agreement of the appellant, the sealer, and the secretary.

(5) The secretary shall decide the appeal on the record of the hearing, including the written evidence and the written argument described in paragraph (2), that he or she has received. If the secretary finds substantial evidence in the record to support the
 sealer’s decision, the secretary shall affirm the decision.

(6) The secretary shall render a written decision within 45 days of the date of appeal or within 15 days of the date of oral arguments or as soon thereafter as practicable.

(7) On an appeal pursuant to this section, the secretary may affirm the sealer’s decision, modify the sealer’s decision by reducing or increasing the amount of the penalty levied so that it is within the secretary’s guidelines for imposing civil penalties, or reverse the sealer’s decision. Any civil penalty increased by the secretary shall not be higher than that proposed in the sealer’s notice of proposed action given pursuant to subdivision (b). A copy of the secretary’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to the appellant and the sealer.

(8) Any person who does not request a hearing
 pursuant to subdivision (b) may not file an appeal pursuant to this subdivision.

(9) Review of a decision of the secretary may be sought by the appellant within 30 days of the date of the decision pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) After the exhaustion of the appeal and review procedures provided in this section, the sealer, or his or her representative, may file a certified copy of a final decision of the sealer that directs the payment of a civil penalty and, if applicable, a copy of any decision of the secretary or his or her authorized representative rendered on an appeal from the sealer’s decision and a copy of any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. No fees shall be charged
 by the clerk of the superior court for the performance of any official service required in connection with the entry of judgment pursuant to this section.

(e) If the civil penalty is levied by the State Sealer, the revenues derived therefrom shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and, upon appropriation, shall be used by the State Sealer to carry out his or her responsibilities under this division. If the civil penalty is levied by the county sealer, the revenues shall be deposited in the general fund of the county and, upon appropriation by the board of supervisors, shall be used by the county sealer to carry out his or her responsibilities under this division.

(f) This section does not apply to violations involving utility meters, or to violations involving the testing and inspection of utility meters, in mobilehome parks, recreational vehicle parks,
 or apartment complexes, where the owner of the park or complex owns and is responsible for the utility meters.

(g) Upon the written request of the Attorney General of California, any district attorney, or any city prosecutor or city attorney described in subdivision (a) of Section 17206, the State Sealer or the county sealer within their respective jurisdictions, shall provide all reports and records regarding any actions that occurred within the four months prior to the date of the written request in which civil penalties were levied pursuant to this section or liability for costs incurred are determined pursuant to Section 12015.5.

(h) No investigative costs shall be imposed pursuant to Section 12015.5 for violations for which civil penalties are imposed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 529, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12015.5.

Any person convicted of violating any of the provisions of this division, or, except as provided in Section 12015.3, any person who is determined to be civilly liable for violating any of the provisions of this division, shall be liable for reasonable costs incurred in investigating the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 529, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12016.

Any person who hinders or obstructs in any way any sealer, in the performance of his official duties, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

12017.

All officers, directors and managers of corporations, whose respective corporations use or sell any weights, measures, or weighing or measuring instruments which are subject to inspection shall comply with the provisions of this division on behalf of their respective corporations; and all officers, directors and managers of corporations, whose respective corporations sell any commodity which is subject to inspection shall comply with the provisions of this division on behalf of their respective corporations.

In case any corporation violates any of the provisions of this division, the corporation and the officers thereof directly
 concerned with the act or acts constituting such violation shall be severally guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12018.

Any person neglecting or refusing to exhibit any weight, measure, weighing or measuring instrument, or appliances and accessories connected therewith in his possession or under his control, to any sealer for inspection and examination is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12019.

A false weight or measure is one which does not conform to the standard established or recognized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

12020.

It shall be unlawful for any person, by himself or through or for another, to use for commercial purposes any weight or measure or weighing, measuring or counting instrument, knowing it to be “incorrect” as this term is defined in subdivision (d) of Section 12500. Every person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 977.)
-------------------------------------------

12021.

Every person who knowingly marks or stamps false or short weight or measure, or knowingly takes false tare, on any container, or knowingly sells any container so marked, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.

Every person who, in putting up in any container, goods usually sold by weight, puts in or conceals therein any other substance including moisture, except such moisture as may be included or absorbed by the goods or commodity contained therein during preparation for market or processing in accordance with ordinary commercial practice, for the purpose of increasing the weight of such container with intent thereby to sell the goods therein or to
 enable another to sell the same, for an increased weight, is punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) for each offense. The amount of added moisture contained in poultry meat as defined in Section 380.20 of the Agricultural Code shall not exceed 4 percent by weight or any greater amount established by regulation of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 46.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12022.5.

Fresh meat or roasts of any kind or cut shall be exposed, advertised, offered for sale or sold on the basis of net weight of the fresh meat or roast only, and any added fat of any kind whatsoever either wrapped within or injected with a larding needle or otherwise inserted in such fresh meat or roast shall be considered as tare weight only.

Notwithstanding the above provision, added fat shall not be considered tare weight if the meat package containing such added fat is clearly and prominently labeled in eight-point type or larger with the term “fat added.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1077.)
-------------------------------------------

12023.

Except as provided elsewhere in this code any person who by himself or his employee or agent, or as the employee or agent of another, sells any commodity according to gross weight or measure is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 272.)
-------------------------------------------

12023.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or any other law, jute cordage, hard fiber cordage, and hard fiber twine (whether covered or uncovered) may be marked and sold on a gross weight basis. The provisions of the fore-going sentence shall not apply to sales in retail stores for consumer use of any such product which has been removed from the wrapper or container in which it was received by the retailer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 190.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.

Every person, who by himself or herself, or through or for another, sells any commodity in less quantity than he or she represents it to be is guilty of a misdemeanor, except as provided in Section 12024.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1380, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.1.

Every person, by himself, or through or for another, who willfully misrepresents a charge for service rendered on the basis of weight, time, measure, or count is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 731.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.2.

(a) It is unlawful for any person, at the time of sale of a commodity, to do any of the following:

(1) Charge an amount greater than the price, or to compute an amount greater than a true extension of a price per unit, that is then advertised, posted, marked, displayed, or quoted for that commodity.

(2) Charge an amount greater than the lowest price posted on the commodity itself or on a shelf tag that corresponds
 to the commodity, notwithstanding any limitation of the time period for which the posted price is in effect.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding one year, or by both, if the violation is willful or grossly negligent, or when the overcharge is more than one dollar ($1).

(c) A violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) when the overcharge is one dollar ($1) or less.

(d) As used in subdivisions (b) and (c), “overcharge” means the amount by which the charge for a commodity exceeds a price that is advertised, posted, marked, displayed, or quoted to that consumer for that
 commodity at the time of sale.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (f), for purposes of this section, when more than one price for the same commodity is advertised, posted, marked, displayed, or quoted, the person offering the commodity for sale shall charge the lowest of those prices.

(f) Pricing may be subject to a condition of sale, such as membership in a retailer-sponsored club, the purchase of a minimum quantity, or the purchase of multiples of the same item, provided that the condition is conspicuously posted in the same location as the price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.3.

(a) For commodities prepackaged and sold or offered for sale on the same premises, a violation of Section 12024 is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not exceeding one year, or by both, if any of the following occurs:

(1) The violation is willful.

(2) The total monetary value of the shortage, calculated on the basis of the average error of an individual lot, exceeds two dollars
 ($2), as determined pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to Section 12211.

(3) The total monetary value of shortages, calculated on the basis of the average error of each individual lot, as determined from a sample of packages selected pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to Section 12211, within all lots found to be in violation of Section 12024 at a single location, exceeds ten dollars ($10).

(b) For commodities prepackaged and sold or offered for sale on the same premises, a violation of Section 12024 is an infraction, punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100), if the violation is of less monetary value than that specified in subdivision (a) and it is not willful.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1245, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

12024.5.
